dic/ligurian_IT_Verb_1stConj.dic
15
ammâ/AB po:verb
giâ/AD po:verb
ligâ/AC po:verb
mangiâ/AC po:verb
porta/*
portan/*
portâ/AB po:verb
porte/*
porti/*
porto/*
pòrta po:verb st:portâ is:present_ind_3s is:imperative_2s
pòrtan po:verb st:portâ is:present_ind_3p is:present_subj_3p
pòrte/b po:verb st:portâ is:present_subj_1s is:present_subj_3s
pòrti/a po:verb st:portâ is:present_ind_2s is:present_subj_2s
pòrto po:verb st:portâ is:present_ind_1s
